Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2146
Violations; criminal penalty.

Any insurer which willfully violates the Insurance Holding Company System Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. Any director, officer, employee, or agent of an insurer who willfully violates the act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 26.